Maine, session 132, LD1154.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1599-A, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Abortion" means the act of using or prescribing any instrument, medicine, drug or
any other substance, device or means with the intent to terminate a clinically
diagnosable pregnancy with knowledge that the termination by those means will with
reasonable likelihood cause the death of the fetus. "Abortion" does not include an act
under this paragraph with the intent to:
(1) Save the life or preserve the health of the fetus;
(2) Remove a dead fetus caused by spontaneous abortion; or
(3) Remove an ectopic pregnancy.
B. "Ectopic pregnancy" means a condition where a fertilized egg attaches outside of a
uterus.
C. "Lethal fetal anomaly" means a fetal condition diagnosed before birth that with
reasonable certainty will result in the death of the child within 3 months after birth.
D. "Medical emergency" means a medical condition that, on the basis of a physician's
good faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical condition of a pregnant
woman as to necessitate the immediate termination of the woman's pregnancy to avert
the death of the woman or for which a delay will create a serious risk of substantial and
irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.
E. "Perinatal hospice services" means comprehensive support to a pregnant woman
who has received a prenatal diagnosis indicating the fetus has a life-limiting condition
and may die before or shortly after birth that includes supportive care to the woman
and the woman's family from time of diagnosis through the time of birth and death of
the child through the postpartum period. Supportive care may include counseling and
medical care by a maternal and fetal medical specialist, obstetrician, neonatologist,
anesthesia specialist, member of the clergy, social worker or specialty nurse focused
on alleviating fear and ensuring that the woman and the woman's family experience the
life and death of the child in a comfortable and supportive environment.
F. "Spontaneous abortion" means a pregnancy loss before 20 weeks of gestation, also
referred to as a miscarriage.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1599-A, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 61, §4, is
amended to read:
C. The particular risks associated with her own pregnancy and the abortion technique
to be performed; and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §1599-A, sub-§2, ¶D, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 61, §4, is
amended to read:
D. At the woman's request, alternatives to abortion such as childbirth and adoption and
information concerning public and private agencies that will provide the woman with
Page 1 - 132LR1106(01)

411 economic and other assistance to carry the fetus to term, including, if the woman so
422 requests, a list of these agencies and the services available from each.; and
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §1599-A, sub-§2, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. For a woman seeking an abortion of a fetus diagnosed with a lethal fetal anomaly,
except in the case of a medical emergency, at least 24 hours before the abortion orally
and in person that perinatal hospice services are available as an alternative to abortion
and shall provide the woman with a list of perinatal hospice services providers under
subsection 3. If the woman declines perinatal hospice services and elects to proceed
with the abortion, the woman must certify in writing the woman's decision to decline
the perinatal hospice services, the woman's decision to proceed with the abortion and
that the woman received the list under subsection 3.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §1599-A, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. List of perinatal hospice services providers. The department shall publish and
maintain a list of available perinatal hospice services providers both in the State and
nationally, organized by geographical location and written in English, Spanish and any
other language the department determines appropriate given the non-English speaking
population of the State.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §1599-A, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Violations. A violation of this section by a health care professional, as defined in
section 1596, subsection 1, paragraph C, constitutes unprofessional conduct subjecting the
health care professional to discipline under Title 32, chapter 31, 36 or 48.